Maine, session 132, LD478.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 29-A MRSA §2074, sub-§1, ¶D, as amended by PL 2005, c. 577, §30, is
further amended to read:
D. Forty-five miles per hour on all other public ways unless otherwise posted; and,
except that on a public way where at least one residence is within 15 feet of the public
way, the following maximum rates of speed apply:
(1) Twenty-five miles per hour for a snowplow and equipment used by the
department exclusively for the removal of snow on the public way;
(2) Twenty-five miles per hour for a vehicle with at least 5 axles; and
(3) Thirty-five miles per hour for all other vehicles; and